New York, session 2025-2026, A6804.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions (b) and (d) of section 81.14 of the mental 2 hygiene law, as added by chapter 698 of the laws of 1992, are amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (b) [The court shall not enter an order sealing the court records in a 5 proceeding under this article, either in whole or in part, except upon a 6 written finding of good cause, which shall specify the grounds thereof. 7 In determining whether good cause has been shown, the court shall 8 consider the interest of the public, the orderly and sound adminis- 9 tration of justice, the nature of the proceedings, and the privacy of 10 the person alleged to be incapacitated. Where it appears necessary or 11 desirable, the court may prescribe appropriate notice and opportunity to 12 be heard.] Court records in a proceeding under this article shall not be 13 perused, examined, disclosed, taken or copied by any other person than a 14 party, the attorney or counsel of a party, the guardian, the court eval- 15 uator, the court examiner except by order of the court, or the office of 16 the attorney general. Court records shall include all documents and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03618-03-6 A. 6804--A 2 1 records of any nature filed with the clerk in connection with the 2 proceeding. Documents obtained through disclosure and not filed with the 3 clerk shall remain subject to protective orders under the civil practice 4 law and rules. 5 (d) At the time of the commencement of the hearing, the court shall 6 inform the allegedly incapacitated person of his or her right to request 7 for good cause [that the court records be sealed and] that a person, 8 persons, or the general public be excluded from the hearing. 9 § 2. Applicability. The obligation of a county clerk to limit access 10 to the records of proceedings occurring prior to the effective date of 11 this act shall only be limited to the extent that a county clerk can 12 readily identify the records of proceedings to which this act applies. A 13 court may also seal or limit access to the records of proceedings held 14 prior to the effective date of this act, provided, however, that such 15 action shall not abridge the court's authority to further restrict 16 access for good cause shown pursuant to any other law, regulation or 17 rule. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any and 19 all past, present and future proceedings held pursuant to article 81 of 20 the mental hygiene law on and after the effective date of this act.